Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 3. Limited Partners.

§ 50-73.22.
Repealed by Acts 1987, c. 702.

§ 50-73.22:1.
Admission of limited partners.

A person becomes a limited partner on the later of:

The date the original certificate of limited partnership is filed; or

The date stated in the records of the limited partnership as the date that person becomes a limited partner.

After the filing of a limited partnership’s initial certificate of limited partnership, a person may be admitted as an additional limited partner:

In the case of a person acquiring a partnership interest directly from the limited partnership, upon compliance with the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not so provide, upon the written consent of all partners; and

In the case of an assignee of a partnership interest of a partner who has the power, as provided in §

50-73.47

, to grant the assignee the right to become a limited partner, upon the exercise of that power and compliance with any conditions limiting the grant or exercise of the power.

History.

1987, c. 702.

§ 50-73.23.
Voting.

Subject to §

50-73.24

, the partnership agreement may grant to all or a specified group of the limited partners the right to vote upon any matter, on a per capita or other basis, upon any matter.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702.

§ 50-73.24.
Liability to third parties.

Except as provided in subsection D, a limited partner is not liable for the obligations of a limited partnership unless he is also a general partner or, in addition to the exercise of his rights and powers as a limited partner, he participates in the control of the business. However, if the limited partner participates in the control of the business, he is liable only to persons who transact business with the limited partnership reasonably believing, based upon the limited partner’s conduct, that the limited partner is a general partner.

A limited partner does not participate in the control of the business within the meaning of subsection A solely by doing one or more of the following:

Being a contractor for or an agent or employee of the limited partnership or of a general partner, or being an officer, director or shareholder of a general partner that is a corporation or being a partner of a partnership that is a general partner of the limited partnership;

Consulting with and advising a general partner with respect to the business of the limited partnership;

Acting as surety for the limited partnership or guaranteeing or assuming one or more specific obligations of the limited partnership;

Taking any action required or permitted by law to bring or pursue a derivative action in the right of the limited partnership;

Requesting or attending a meeting of partners;

Proposing, approving or disapproving, by voting or otherwise, one or more of the following matters:

The dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership;

The sale, exchange, lease, mortgage, pledge, or other transfer of all or substantially all of the assets of the limited partnership;

The incurrence of indebtedness by the limited partnership other than in the ordinary course of its business;

A change in the nature of the business;

The admission or removal of a general partner;

The admission or removal of a limited partner;

A transaction involving an actual or potential conflict of interest between a general partner and the limited partnership or the limited partners;

An amendment to the partnership agreement or certificate of limited partnership; or

Matters related to the business of the limited partnership not otherwise enumerated in this subsection, which the partnership agreement states may be subject to the approval or disapproval of limited partners;

The enumeration in subsection B does not mean that the possession or exercise of any other powers by a limited partner constitutes participation by him in the business of the limited partnership.

A limited partner who knowingly permits his name to be used in the name of the limited partnership, except under circumstances permitted by subdivision B 1 of §

50-73.2

, is liable to creditors who extend credit to the limited partnership without actual knowledge that the limited partner is not a general partner.

7.

Winding up the limited partnership pursuant to §

50-73.51

; or

8.

Exercising any right or power permitted to limited partners under this chapter and not specifically enumerated in this subsection.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1990, c. 343; 2012, c. 63.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 63, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to the effective date of this act with respect to the name of a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the propriety of its name prior to the effective date of this act to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 63 deleted “of this section” following “subsection D” in subsection A; in subsection B, deleted “of this section” following “subsection A” in the introductory paragraph and substituted “in this subsection” for “subsection B of this section” in subdivision B 6 i and in subsection C; and substituted “subdivision B 1 of §

50-73.2

” for “subdivision 2 of §

50-73.2

” in subsection D. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

§ 50-73.25.
Person erroneously believing himself limited partner.

Except as provided in subsection B of this section, a person who makes a contribution to a partnership and erroneously but in good faith believes that he has become a limited partner in the partnership is not a general partner in the partnership and is not bound by its obligations by reason of making the contribution, receiving distributions from the partnership, or exercising any rights of a limited partner, if, on ascertaining the mistake, he:

Causes an appropriate certificate of limited partnership or a certificate of amendment to be executed and filed; or

Withdraws from future equity participation in the partnership by executing and filing with the Commission a certificate declaring his withdrawal under the provisions of this section.

A person who makes a contribution of the kind described in subsection A of this section is liable as a general partner to any third party who transacts business with the partnership prior to the occurrence of either of the events referred to in subsection A of this section if: (i) such person knew or should have known either that no certificate has been filed or that the certificate inaccurately refers to him as a general partner and (ii) the other person actually believed in good faith that the person was a general partner at the time of the transaction and acted in reliance on such belief.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702.

§ 50-73.26.
Information.

Each limited partner has the right, subject to such reasonable standards as set forth in the partnership agreement, to:

Inspect and copy any of the partnership records required to be maintained by §

50-73.8

; and

Obtain from the general partners from time to time upon reasonable demand (i) true and full information regarding the state of the business and financial condition of the limited partnership, (ii) promptly after becoming available, a copy of the limited partnership’s federal, state and local income tax returns for each year, and (iii) other information regarding the affairs of the limited partnership as is just and reasonable.

History.

1985, c. 607.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Reasonableness language of the Code is a requirement that the plaintiff must meet. —

Court does not find that the statute creates a right to a reasonable request that may later be waived; the reasonableness language of the Code is a requirement that the plaintiff must meet in order to obtain the information sought. Gordon v. Arrowhead Apts. Ltd. P'ship, 104 Va. Cir. 355, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 62 (Fairfax County Mar. 23, 2020).

Va. Code Ann. §

50-73.26

governs a limited partner’s right to seek information, so the Virginia Uniform Partnership Act (VUPA) does not apply; the VUPA would only apply where there is a conflict between the operating agreement and the Code. The VRULPA does not provide guidance for resolving issues between the operating agreement and the VRULPA, which in turn means that the court must look to the VUPA to resolve such a conflict. Gordon v. Arrowhead Apts. Ltd. P'ship, 104 Va. Cir. 355, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 62 (Fairfax County Mar. 23, 2020).

Reasonable purpose. —

Plaintiff was required to state some reasonable purpose for demanding the information sought, and because plaintiff failed to do so, defendants’ demurrer was sustained with leave to amend as to all counts. Gordon v. Arrowhead Apts. Ltd. P'ship, 104 Va. Cir. 355, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 62 (Fairfax County Mar. 23, 2020).

Construction. —

Reading the statutes together, the information sought pursuant to subdivision 1 of §

50-73.26

must be at the reasonable request of a limited partner and the statutes requires a plaintiff to state some reasonable purpose for the demand; the General Assembly’s intent to restrict a limited partner’s right to demand information is further shown in subdivision 2 of §

50-73.26

, which only allows limited partners to seek further information that is not otherwise outlined in §

50-73.8

from time to time. Gordon v. Arrowhead Apts. Ltd. P'ship, 104 Va. Cir. 355, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 62 (Fairfax County Mar. 23, 2020).